test/tools/mt/apertium/apertiumtests_mt-apertium-desc.und.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../../../tools/mt/apertium/generator-mt-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../../../tools/mt/apertium/analyser-mt-gt-desc.hfstol
    App: lookup

Tests:

# Tag tests:
  Proper nouns:
    Россия<np><al><f><nn><sg><nom> : Россия

  Verbs:
    видеть<vblex><impf><iv><pres><p1><sg> : вижу

  Participles:
    натянуть<vblex><perf><tv><pp><pasv><mfn><an><pl><ins> : натянутыми
    быть<vblex><impf><iv><pprs><actv><mfn><an><pl><ins> : бывшими

  Adjectives:
    современный<adj><mfn><an><pl><gen> : современных

  Pronouns:
    оно<prn><pers><p3><nt><sg><nom> : оно 
    он<prn><pers><p3><m><sg><nom> : он
    она<prn><pers><p3><f><sg><nom> : она

  Determiners:
    его<det><pos><m><an><sg><nom> : его 
